Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.355

Sealing of records—Extreme risk protection orders.

(1) A respondent under the age of 18, or a respondent whose extreme risk protection order was based solely on threats of self-harm by the respondent, may petition the court to have the court records sealed from public view at the time of the issuance of the full order, at any time during the life of the order, or at any time after its expiration.

(2) The court shall seal the court records from public view if there are no other active protection orders against the restrained party, there are no pending violations of the order, and there is evidence of full compliance with the surrender of firearms as ordered by the extreme risk protection order.

(3) Nothing in this section changes the requirement for the order to be entered into, and maintained in, computer-based systems as required in RCW 7.105.350.

[ 2021 c 215 s 48.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.